Mississippi statutes. Title 45. Public Safety and Good Order
Chapter 10. Novelty Lighters

§ 45-10-1.
Definition.

For purposes of this chapter, “novelty lighter” means a mechanical or electrical device typically used for lighting cigarettes, cigars or pipes, grills, fireplaces, campfires or campfire stoves that is designed to resemble a cartoon character, toy, gun, watch, musical instrument, vehicle, animal, food or beverage, or similar articles, or that plays musical notes, or has flashing lights for entertainment or has other entertaining features.A novelty lighter may operate on any fuel, including butane, isobutane or liquid fuel. “Novelty lighter” does not include:

A lighter manufactured prior to January 1, 1980;

A lighter incapable of being fueled or lacking a device necessary to produce combustion or a flame;

Standard disposable and refillable lighters that are printed or decorated with logos, labels, decals or artwork, or heat shrinkable sleeves.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 354, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2010.

§ 45-10-3.
Prohibition; penalty.

A person may not sell at retail, offer for retail sale or distribute for retail sale or promotion in this state a novelty lighter.A person who violates this section commits a civil violation for which a fine of not more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) may be imposed.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 354, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2010.

§ 45-10-5.
Exception.

The prohibition specified in Section 45-10-3 does not apply to the transportation of novelty lighters through this state or the storage of novelty lighters in a warehouse or distribution center in this state that is closed to the public for purposes of retail sales.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 354, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2010.

§ 45-10-7.
Enforcement.

This section may be enforced by the State Fire Marshal’s office; a state, county or municipal law enforcement officer; or a municipal code enforcement officer.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 354, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2010.